Connecticut, session 2026, HB05484.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-343 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Social Services shall establish annually the
maximum allowable rate to be paid by agencies for homemaker
services, chore person services, companion services, respite care, meals
on wheels, adult day care services, case management and assessment
services, transportation, mental health counseling and elderly foster
care. The Commissioner of Social Services shall prescribe uniform forms
on which agencies providing such services shall report their costs for
such services. Such rates shall be determined on the basis of a reasonable
payment for necessary services rendered. The maximum allowable rates
established by the Commissioner of Social Services for the Connecticut
home-care program for the elderly established under section 17b-342
shall constitute the rates required under this section until revised in
HB5484 / File No. 392 1

HB5484 File No. 392
accordance with this section. The Commissioner of Social Services shall
establish a fee schedule, to be effective on and after July 1, 1994, for
homemaker services, chore person services, companion services, respite
care, meals on wheels, adult day care services, case management and
assessment services, transportation, mental health counseling and
elderly foster care. The commissioner may annually increase the fee
schedule based on an increase in the cost of services. On and after July
1, 2026, the commissioner shall increase the fee schedule for a home care
provider, as defined in section 17b-374, who provides transportation to
or from medical appointments for home care clients who are Medicaid
beneficiaries, provided such provider has a state-issued driver's license
and sufficient liability insurance as prescribed by the commissioner. The
commissioner shall increase the fee schedule effective July 1, 2000, by
not less than five per cent, for adult day care services. The commissioner
shall increase the fee schedule effective July 1, 2011, by four dollars per
person, per day for adult day care services. The commissioner shall
increase the fee schedule effective July 1, 2019, for meals on wheels by
ten per cent over the fee schedule for meals on wheels for the previous
fiscal year. Effective July 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner may increase the fee schedule for meals on wheels
providers serving participants in the Connecticut home-care program
for the elderly by, at a minimum, the cost-of-living adjustment as
measured by the consumer price index. The commissioner may increase
any fee payable to a meals on wheels provider upon the application of
such provider evidencing extraordinary costs related to delivery of
meals on wheels in sparsely populated rural regions of the state.
Nothing contained in this section shall authorize a payment by the state
to any agency for such services in excess of the amount charged by such
agency for such services to the general public.
Sec. 2. Section 17b-276 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (c) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, on and
after July 1, 2026, the commissioner shall reimburse a home care
provider, as defined in section 17b-374, who provides a home care client
HB5484 / File No. 392 2

HB5484 File No. 392
who is a Medicaid beneficiary transportation to or from a medical
appointment, provided such home care provider has a state-issued
driver's license and sufficient liability insurance as prescribed by the
commissioner.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-343
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 17b-276(c)
HS Joint Favorable
HB5484 / File No. 392 3

HB5484 File No. 392
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost Indeterminate Indeterminate
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS)
associated with increasing payments for home care providers who
transport Medicaid clients to or from medical appointments. The extent
of the cost cannot be determined at this time as the bill does not specify
the scope of the increases.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to payment rates and associated
utilization.
HB5484 / File No. 392 4

HB5484 File No. 392
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5484
AN ACT EXPANDING TRANSPORTATION OPTIONS FOR HOME
CARE CLIENTS.